Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2043
Temporary educational or visiting faculty permit; disciplinary action; grounds.

Any temporary educational or visiting faculty permit may be suspended, limited, or revoked by the department, with the recommendation of the board, at any time upon a finding that the reasons for issuing such permit no longer exist or that the person to whom such permit has been issued is no longer qualified to hold such permit.

Laws 1969, c. 560, § 17, p. 2285;

Laws 1971, LB 150, § 14;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 433;

Laws 1999, LB 828, § 89;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,107.11;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 701.